Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1888YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 187 Section 1. Section 257.11B, subsection 2, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (2), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 For the school budget year years beginning on or after July 4 1, 2024, the following pupils who attend a nonpublic school 5 for that school budget year shall be eligible to receive an 6 education savings account payment: 7 Sec. 2. Section 257.11B, subsection 2, paragraph a, 8 subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 9 subparagraph. 10 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 11 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 12